nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Gezondheidszorg > Benodigdheden voor fysiotherapie: Balansborden; Compressietherapie apparaten; Cupping therapie set; Elektrische spierstimulator accessoires; Elektrische spierstimulators; Hand therapie en oefening gereedschap; Weerstandsbanden; Shockwave therapie apparaten; Therapeutische schommels; Therapie ballen; Therapie klei
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Opieka zdrowotna > Sprzęt do fizjoterapii: Deski balansujące; Urządzenia do terapii uciskowej; Zestawy do terapii bańkami; Akcesoria do elektrostymulatorów mięśni; Elektryczne stymulatory mięśni; Narzędzia do terapii i ćwiczeń dłoni; Taśmy oporowe; Urządzenia do terapii falą uderzeniową; Huśtawki terapeutyczne; Piłki rehabilitacyjne; Masa terapeutyczna
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados com a saúde > Equipamentos de fisioterapia: Quadros de equilíbrio; Dispositivos de terapia de compressão; Conjuntos de terapia com ventosas; Acessórios para estimulador muscular elétrico; Estimuladores musculares elétricos; Ferramentas de terapia e exercícios para mãos; Faixas de resistência; Dispositivos de terapia por ondas de choque; Balanços terapêuticos; Bolas terapêuticas; Massa terapêutica
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Sundhedspleje > Udstyr til fysisk terapi: Balancebrædder; Kompressionsterapienheder; Cupping-terapisæt; Elektrisk muskelstimulator – tilbehør; Elektrisk muskelstimulation; Håndterapi- og træningsredskaber; Modstandsbånd; Chokbølge-terapienheder; Terapigynger; Terapibolde; Therapy putty
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Gesundheitspflege > Ergo- & Physiotherapeutische Hilfsmittel: Balance-Boards; Kompressionstherapiegeräte; Schröpftherapie-Sets; Zubehör für elektrische Muskelstimulatoren; Elektrische Muskelstimulatoren; Handtherapie- & Übungswerkzeuge; Widerstandsbänder; Stoßwellentherapiegeräte; Therapieschaukeln; Therapiebälle; Therapieknete
en: Health & Beauty > Health Care > Occupational & Physical Therapy Equipment: Balance Boards; Compression Therapy Devices; Cupping Therapy Sets; Electrical Muscle Stimulator Accessories; Electrical Muscle Stimulators; Hand Therapy & Exercise Tools; Resistance Bands; Shockwave Therapy Devices; Therapeutic Swings; Therapy Balls; Therapy Putty
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Terveydenhoito > Toimintaterapia- ja fysioterapiavälineet: Tasapainolaudat; Kompressioterapialaite; Kuppausterapiasetti; Sähköinen lihasstimulaattorilisävaruste; Sähköiset lihasstimulointilaitteet; Käsiterapia- ja harjoitteluväline; Vastuskuminauha; Shokkiaaltohoitolaite; Terapiakeinut; Terapiapallo; Terapiasavi
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Briga za zdravlje > Oprema za radnu i fizikalnu terapiju: Ploče za ravnotežu; Uređaji za kompresijsku terapiju; Setovi za vakuumsku terapiju; Dodatna oprema za električne stimulatore mišića; Električni stimulatori mišića; Terapeutski alati za ruke; Elastične trake za vježbanje; Uređaji za terapiju udarnim valovima; Terapijske ljuljačke; Terapeutske lopte; Terapijski plastelin
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Chăm sóc sức khỏe > Thiết bị trị liệu vật lý và cơ năng: Ván tập thăng bằng; Thiết bị trị liệu nén; Bộ giác hút trị liệu; Phụ kiện máy kích thích cơ điện; Máy kích thích cơ bằng xung điện; Dụng cụ trị liệu và tập luyện bàn tay; Dây kháng lực; Thiết bị trị liệu sóng xung kích; Đu đưa để trị liệu; Bóng trị liệu; Đất sét trị liệu
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Hälsovård > Utrustning för sjukgymnastik: Balansbrädor; Kompressionsterapienheter; Koppningsset; Elektriska muskelstimulatortillbehör; Elektriska muskelsimulatorer; Handterapi- och träningsredskap; Motståndsband; Stötvågsterapienheter; Terapigungor; Terapibollar; Terapikitt
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 医疗保健 > 作业疗法/理疗设备: 平衡板; 压缩治疗设备; 拔罐套装; 电肌肉刺激器配件; 肌肉电刺激仪; 手部治疗与锻炼工具; 阻力带; 冲击波治疗设备; 治疗性秋千; 治疗球; 治疗泥
hu: Egészség és szépség > Egészségügyi ellátás > Foglalkozási és fizikoterápiás berendezések: Egyensúlytáblák; Kompressziós terápiás eszközök; Köpölyöző terápiás készletek; Elektromos izomstimulátor-kiegészítők; Elektromos izomstimulátorok; Kézterápia és gyakorló eszközök; Ellenállásos gumiszalagok; Lökéshullám-terápiás eszközök; Terápiás hinták; Terápiás labdák; Terápiás gyurma
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Φροντίδα υγείας > Εξοπλισμός εργοθεραπείας & φυσικοθεραπείας: Σανίδες ισορροπίας; Συσκευές θεραπείας συμπίεσης; Σετ θεραπείας με βεντούζες; Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτροδιέγερσης μυών; Ηλεκτρικοί διεγέρτες μυών; Εργαλεία θεραπείας και άσκησης χεριών; Λάστιχα αντίστασης; Συσκευές κρουστικών κυμάτων; Θεραπευτικές Κούνιες; Μπάλες θεραπείας; Πηλός θεραπείας
ru: Красота и здоровье > Медицинские товары > Оборудование для физиотерапии и эрготерапии: Балансборды; Устройства компрессионной терапии; Наборы для баночной терапии; Аксессуары для электромышечных стимуляторов; Электростимуляторы мышц; Инструменты для терапии и упражнений для рук; Эластичные ленты сопротивления; Устройства ударно-волновой терапии; Терапевтические качели; Терапевтические мячи; Терапевтическая замазка
th: สุขภาพและความงาม > การดูแลสุขภาพ > อุปกรณ์บำบัดทางอาชีพและทางกายภาพ: กระดานฝึกสมดุล; เครื่องบำบัดด้วยการกดอัด; ชุดอุปกรณ์ครอบแก้ว; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องกระตุ้นกล้ามเนื้อไฟฟ้า; เครื่องกระตุ้นกล้ามเนื้อแบบใช้ไฟฟ้า; อุปกรณ์บริหารและบำบัดมือ; สายยางยืดออกกำลังกาย; เครื่องบำบัดด้วยคลื่นกระแทก; ชิงช้าบำบัด; ลูกบอลบำบัด; ดินน้ำมันบำบัด
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijirea sănătății > Echipamente pentru fizioterapie și terapie ocupațională: Plăci pentru echilibru; Dispozitive pentru terapie de compresie; Seturi pentru terapie cu ventuze; Accesorii pentru stimulatoare electrice musculare; Echipamente pentru stimulare electrică a mușchilor; Instrumente pentru terapie și exerciții pentru mâini; Benzi de rezistență; Dispozitive pentru terapie cu unde de șoc; Leagăne terapeutice; Mingi terapeutice; Plastilină terapeutică
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Helsestell > Utstyr for ergo- og fysioterapi: Balansebrett; Kompresjonsterapiutstyr; Koppingsett; Elektrisk muskelstimulator tilbehør; Elektriske muskelstimulatorer; Håndterapi- og treningsverktøy; Motstandsbånd; Sjokkbølgeterapiutstyr; Terapihusker; Terapiballer; Terapileire
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado de la salud > Equipos de fisioterapia: Tablas de equilibrio; Dispositivos de terapia de compresión; Kits de terapia con ventosas; Accesorios de electroestimulador muscular; Estimuladores musculares eléctricos; Herramientas de terapia y ejercicio de mano; Bandas de resistencia; Dispositivos de terapia de ondas de choque; Columpios terapéuticos; Pelotas de terapia; Masilla terapéutica
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Sveikatos priežiūra > Profesinės ir fizinės terapijos įranga: Pusiausvyros treniravimo lentos; Kompresijos terapijos prietaisai; Vakuuminės taurės terapijos rinkiniai; Elektrinių raumenų stimuliatorių priedai; Elektriniai raumenų stimuliatoriai; Rankų terapijos ir pratimų įrankiai; Pasipriešinimo gumos; Smūginės bangos terapijos prietaisai; Terapinės sūpynės; Terapijos kamuoliai; Terapinis plastilinas
ja: 美容・健康 > ヘルスケア > 理学療法機器: バランスボード; 圧迫療法器具; カッピング療法セット; 電気筋肉刺激装置用アクセサリー; EMS; ハンドセラピー・手指運動器具; レジスタンスバンド; 衝撃波治療器; セラピー用ブランコ; セラピーボール; セラピーパテ
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Sağlık Bakım > İş Terapisi ve Fiziksel Terapi Ekipmanları: Denge Tahtaları; Kompresyon Terapi Cihazları; Kupa Terapi Setleri; Elektrikli Kas Stimülatörü Aksesuarları; Elektrikli Kas Uyarıcılar; El Terapisi ve Egzersiz Araçları; Direnç Bantları; Şok Dalga Terapi Cihazları; Terapi Salıncakları; Terapi Topları; Terapi Hamuru
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Грижа за здравето > Оборудване за трудова и физикална терапия: Дъски за баланс; Компресионни терапевтични устройства; Комплекти за терапия с вендузи; Аксесоари за електрически мускулен стимулатор; Мускулни електростимулатори; Уреди за терапия и упражнения на ръце; Ластични ленти за съпротивление; Устройства за ударно-вълнова терапия; Терапевтични люлки; Терапевтични топки; Терапевтичен пластилин
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados de saúde > Equipamento de terapia física e ocupacional: Tábuas de equilíbrio; Dispositivos de terapia de compressão; Kit de ventosaterapia; Acessórios para eletroestimuladores musculares; Estimuladores musculares elétricos; Ferramentas de terapia e exercício para mãos; Bandas de resistência; Dispositivos de terapia por ondas de choque; Baloiços terapêuticos; Bolas terapêuticas; Massa terapêutica
fr: Santé et beauté > Santé > Matériel d’ergothérapie et de physiothérapie: Planches d’équilibre; Appareils de pressothérapie; Kits de ventouses; Accessoires pour électrostimulateurs musculaires; Électrostimulateurs; Outils de rééducation et d’exercice pour la main; Bandes de résistance; Appareils de thérapie par ondes de choc; Balançoires thérapeutiques; Ballons de thérapie; Pâte de rééducation
it: Salute e bellezza > Salute > Apparecchiature per fisioterapia: Tavole di equilibrio; Dispositivi di terapia compressiva; Set di terapia a coppette; Accessori dello stimolatore muscolare elettrico; Elettrostimolatori muscolari; Strumenti per la terapia della mano e l'esercizio; Fasce elastiche di resistenza; Dispositivi di terapia ad onde d'urto; Amache terapeutiche; Palle da terapia; Stucco per terapia
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Starostlivosť o zdravie > Vybavenie na pracovnú a fyzikálnu terapiu: Balančné dosky; Zariadenia na kompresnú terapiu; Súpravy na bankovanie; Príslušenstvo pre elektrické svalové stimulátory; Elektrické svalové stimulátory; Nástroje na terapiu a cvičenie rúk; Odporové gumy; Zariadenia na terapiu rázovou vlnou; Terapeutické závesné vaky; Terapeutické lopty; Terapeutická plastelína
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Zdravje > Oprema za delovno in fizikalno terapijo: Ravnotežne plošče; Naprave za kompresijsko terapijo; Kompleti za terapijo z ventuzami; Dodatki za električne mišične stimulatorje; Električni mišični stimulatorji; Orodja za terapijo in vadbo rok; Elastični trakovi za vadbo; Naprave za terapijo z udarnimi valovi; Terapevtski gugalniki; Terapevtske žoge; Terapevtska masa
ko: 건강/미용 > 건강 관리 > 작업/물리 치료 장비: 밸런스 보드; 압박 치료 기기; 부항 치료 세트; 전기 근육 자극기 액세서리; 근육 전기자극기; 손 치료 및 운동 도구; 저항 밴드; 충격파 치료 기기; 치료용 그네; 치료용 공; 치료용 퍼티
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 健康照護 > 職能/物理治療器材: 平衡板; 壓迫療法裝置; 拔罐療法套組; 電子肌肉刺激器配件; 電子肌肉刺激裝置; 手部治療及運動工具; 阻力帶; 衝擊波療法裝置; 復健治療懸盪組; 治療球; 治療黏土
cs: Zdraví a krása > Zdravotní péče > Zařízení pro fyzioterapii: Balance boardy; Přístroje pro kompresní terapii; Sady pro baňkování; Příslušenství k elektrickým stimulátorům svalů; Elektrické stimulátory svalů; Pomůcky pro cvičení a terapii rukou; Odporové gumy; Přístroje pro rázovou vlnovou terapii; Fyzioterapeutické houpačky; Terapeutické míče; Terapeutická modelovací hmota